Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.435

Washington state center for court research—Attorney-client privilege.

(1) The Washington state center for court research of the administrative office of the courts shall convene stakeholders, including youth and young adults, to identify the relevant outcome measures and data collection methods that appropriately protect attorney-client privilege to effectively assess:

(a) The number of youth for whom attorneys are appointed pursuant to RCW 13.34.212(3); and

(b) The short and longitudinal impact of standards-based legal representation on case outcomes including family reunification, number of placement changes, and placement with kin of appointment of standards-based representation disaggregated by race, ethnicity, age, disability status, sexual and gender identity, and geography.

(2) By November 30, 2022, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the Washington state center for court research of the administrative office of the courts shall submit an annual report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor outlining the outcome measures identified under this section.

[ 2021 c 210 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 210: See note following RCW 13.34.090.